Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF77.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1225YH (4) 91 dg/ko H.F. 77 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 148K.1 Definitions. 1 1. As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise 2 requires: 3 a. âHealth care facilityâ means all of the following: 4 (1) A facility as defined in section 514J.102. 5 (2) A facility licensed pursuant to chapter 135B or 135C. 6 b. âSurgical technologyâ means surgical patient care that 7 includes but is not limited to all of the following: 8 (1) Preparation of an operating room for a surgical 9 procedure by ensuring that surgical equipment is functioning 10 properly and safely. 11 (2) Preparation of an operating room and the sterile 12 field for a surgical procedure by preparing sterile supplies, 13 instruments, and equipment using sterile techniques. 14 (3) Anticipation of a surgical teamâs needs based on 15 knowledge of human anatomy and pathophysiology and the 16 relationship to a surgical patient and the surgical procedure 17 being performed. 18 (4) As directed in an operating room setting, performance of 19 tasks including all of the following: 20 (a) Passing supplies, equipment, or instruments. 21 (b) Sponging or suctioning an operative site. 22 (c) Preparing and cutting suture material. 23 (d) Transferring fluids or drugs. 24 (e) Holding retractors and other instruments. 25 (f) Handling specimens. 26 (g) Applying electrocautery to clamps on bleeders. 27 (h) Connecting drains to suction apparatuses. 28 (i) Applying dressings to closed wounds. 29 (j) Assisting in sponge, needle, supply, and instrument 30 counts. 31 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 148K.2 Surgical technology ââ practice 32 requirements 33 1. A person shall not practice surgical technology in 34 a health care facility, and a health care facility shall 35 -1- LSB 1225YH (4) 91 dg/ko 1/ 3 H.F. 77 not employ or contract with a person to engage in surgical 1 technology, unless at least one of the following requirements 2 has been satisfied: 3 a. The person has successfully completed a nationally or 4 regionally accredited surgical technology program. 5 b. The person holds and maintains a certification issued 6 by the national board of surgical technology and surgical 7 assisting or another nationally recognized credentialing 8 organization. 9 c. The person has completed a surgical technology training 10 program in the United States army, navy, air force, marine 11 corps, coast guard, or public health service. 12 d. The person provides evidence that the person has been 13 employed to practice surgical technology in a health care 14 facility in this state prior to July 1, 2025. 15 e. The person is in the service of the federal government 16 and surgical technology duties are required as part of their 17 service. 18 2. a. Beginning July 1, 2026, a person qualified to 19 practice surgical technology under subsection 1 shall annually 20 complete fifteen hours of continuing education to remain 21 qualified to practice surgical technology. 22 b. The department of inspections, appeals, and licensing 23 shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A to establish 24 procedures and standards for surgical technology continuing 25 education. 26 3. A health care facility that employs a person to practice 27 surgical technology shall verify the personâs compliance with 28 subsection 1 and the continuing education requirements under 29 subsection 2. 30 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 148K.3 Practice of surgical technology 31 ââ other licensed professionals. 32 This chapter shall not be construed to prohibit a person 33 licensed under chapter 148, 152, 153, or 154 from practicing 34 surgical technology if that person is acting within the scope 35 -2- LSB 1225YH (4) 91 dg/ko 2/ 3 H.F. 77 of the personâs license. 1